Illinois, session 104th, HB1492.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Prison Inspection Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 135/1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1101)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known as the the Illinois Prison 8Inspection Act.9(Source: P.A. 80-367.)